Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 7. Members and Meetings.
§ 13.1-849.
Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

The bylaws may provide the number or percentage of members entitled to vote represented in person or by proxy, or the number or percentage of votes represented in person or by proxy, which shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of members. In the absence of any such provision, members holding one-tenth of the votes entitled to be cast represented in person or by proxy shall constitute a quorum. The vote of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the members present or represented by proxy at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be necessary for the adoption of any matter voted upon by the members, unless a greater proportion is required by this Act or the articles of incorporation. Members entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those members exists with respect to that matter.

Once a member is represented for any purpose at a meeting, the member is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or shall be set for that adjourned meeting.

Less than a quorum may adjourn a meeting.

The election of directors is governed by §

13.1-852

.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-219; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “Act” for “chapter” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A; and in subsection B, substituted “represented for any purpose at a meeting, the member” for “present at a meeting it” and inserted “any” preceding “adjournment.”

§ 13.1-850.
Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the articles of incorporation or this Act provides for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in §

13.1-849

.

If the articles of incorporation or this Act provides for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in §

13.1-849

. Action may be taken by one voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “Act provides” for “chapter provides” in subsection A; and substituted “Act” for “chapter” in the first sentence of subsection B.

§ 13.1-851.
Change in quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation may provide for a lesser or greater quorum requirement for members or voting groups of members than required by this chapter.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a quorum or voting requirement shall meet the quorum requirement and be adopted by the vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-218; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 321.

§ 13.1-852.
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the members entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Members do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “all of a designated voting group of members are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors” or words of similar import means that the members designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

Members otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not vote cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

A member who has the right to cumulate his votes gives notice to the secretary of the corporation not less than 48 hours before the time set for the meeting of the member’s intent to cumulate his votes during the meeting. If one member gives such a notice, all other members in the same voting group participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-221; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 deleted the parenthesis marks in subsection C; and in subdivision D 2, substituted “48 hours” for “forty-eight hours” and “the member’s intent” for “his intent” in the first sentence, substituted “such a” for “this” in the last sentence and made a minor stylistic change.